Hawaii statutes.
[§323D-78] Revocation; hearing. If the
agency receives information indicating that the acquiring person is not
fulfilling the commitment to the affected community under section 323D-77, the
agency shall hold a hearing upon ten days notice to the affected parties. If
after the hearing the agency determines that the information is true, the
department may institute proceedings to revoke the license issued to the
purchaser. [L 1998, c 257, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next